Louisiana, session 2026, HB743.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart F of Part IV of Chapter 2 of Title 2 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 2:350.1 through 350.6 is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
SUBPART F. HARRY P. WILLIAMS MEMORIAL AIRPORT DISTRICT
§350.1. Harry P. Williams Memorial Airport District; creation
There is hereby created the "Harry P. Williams Memorial Airport District",
hereinafter referred to in this Subpart as the "district" subject to approval by a
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-557 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 743
majority vote of the St. Mary Parish Council and approval by the Federal Aviation
Administration (FAA). The district shall come into existence upon such approvals.
The district shall be a political subdivision of the state within the meaning of Article
VI, Section 30 through 33 of the Constitution of Louisiana and those provisions of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 applicable to airport districts and the levy of
taxes, the incurring of debt, and the issuing of bonds by those districts, provided that
any proposal to levy taxes shall require prior approval of the St. Mary Parish
Council.
§350.2. Domicile
A. The domicile of the district shall be in St. Mary Parish. The domicile
may be changed to any place located within the boundaries of the district or may be
the seat of any political subdivision, a portion of which is included within the
boundaries of the district, provided the board approves the change in domicile.
B. The boundaries of the district shall be coterminous with the boundaries
of St. Mary Parish, consisting of the Harry P. Williams Memorial Airport as per
plats, reflecting the aeronautical, commercial, industrial, and agricultural areas of the
area currently designed for aeronautical purpose in the unincorporated area of St.
Mary Parish.
C. The district shall maintain suitable offices in St. Mary Parish.
§350.3. Board of commissioners; appointments; terms; vacancies; qualifications
A.(1) The district shall be governed by a board of commissioners, referred
to in this Subpart as the "board".
(2) The board shall be composed of seven members, all of whom shall be
citizens of the United States and residents of St. Mary Parish. The St. Mary Parish
Council shall have the authority to appoint all members of the board and may, by
majority vote, remove and replace any member.
(3) At a minimum, a board member shall have experience in aviation,
business, accounting, finance, marketing, engineering, law, real estate, economic
development, management, or another field of value to operation of the airport. A
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-557 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 743
full-time employee of local government shall not be eligible for appointment to the
board, except for those responsible for economic development in the parish.
(4)(a) Members of the current St. Mary Parish Airport Advisory Committee
shall serve as the district board members for the remainder of their current terms.
Upon expiration of their terms, successors are to be appointed as provided in this
Subpart, and may serve up to three additional terms of five years.
(b) Service by a board member for four or more years of a term shall be
considered a five-year term for determining the number of terms.
(c) Any vacancy in the membership of the board shall be filled by a majority
vote of the St. Mary Parish Council for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(d) Any member of the board may be removed for cause upon the
recommendation of the majority of the board.
(5)(a) The board shall elect from its own members a chairperson, a vice
chairperson, a secretary, and a treasurer whose duties shall be those usual to such
offices. The offices of secretary and treasurer may be held by one person.
(b) The members of the board shall serve without compensation.
(6)(a) The board shall meet in regular session once each month and shall also
meet in special session as often as the chairperson convenes the board or on the
written request of at least three members. Four members of the district board present
at a meeting shall constitute a quorum. A consensus of a majority of those present
shall be required to pass an agenda item.
(b) The board shall prescribe rules to govern its meetings, and the
chairperson shall be entitled to a vote.
§350.4. Powers of the board
A.(1) The district is a public corporation and has all powers of public
corporations including the right and power to incur debt and contract obligations, to
sue and be sued, to have a corporate seal, and to perform in its corporate capacity and
in its corporate name all acts necessary and proper for the purpose of acquiring,
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-557 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 743
constructing, maintaining, and operating airport and airport facilities, including both
movable and immovable property within its jurisdiction.
(2)(a) The district shall have all the authority as provided in R.S. 2:326 et
seq., and upon the "approval date" the board shall acquire the following powers:
(i) Accessibility to the FAA's approval of the assignment of existing grant
agreements to the district, in the case of an uncertified report, the date specified in
the agreement under which the airport is to be transferred to the district.
(ii) Enter into contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the
performance of its duties and execution of its powers under this Subpart with a
department or agency of the United States, with a state or local governmental
agency, or with another person, public or private, with terms and conditions
acceptable to the district.
(iii) Exercise exclusive responsibility to study and plan any improvements,
expansion, or enhancements that affect the airport and commission planning,
engineering, economic, and other studies to provide information for making
decisions about the location, design, management, and other features of the airport
or airport facilities.
(iv) Exercise responsibility for developing all aspects of the airport and
airport facilities, including but not limited to all the locations of terminals, hangars,
aids to air navigation, parking lots and structures, cargo facilities, and all other
facilities and services necessary to serve passengers and other customers of the
airport.
(v) Obtain street and highway access, including ingress and egress, with the
objective of minimizing, to the extent practicable, traffic congestion on access routes
in the vicinity of the airport.
(vi) Participate in demonstration programs and economic development that
directly benefits the airport.
(vii) Act as a sponsor and submit requests for, accept, and be responsible to
perform all of the assurance associated with accepting grants from the FAA, or
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-557 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 743
another agency of the United States or of this state, with respect to the airport under
the operational jurisdiction of the district, and perform the duties and responsibilities
previously assumed by the local government by virtue of its acceptance of grants
from the FAA or another agency of the United States or this state. The district shall
serve as the agent of the local government for the preparation, submission, execution,
and administration of any state or federal grants pending the effective date of this
Subpart.
(b) For purposes of this Subsection, "approval date" shall mean the date on
which the FAA issues a certificate to the district, conferring operational jurisdiction
over the airport under 14 CFR Part 139.
B. The district shall have the additional power to do the following:
(1) Acquire and assume the exclusive right, responsibility, and authority to
occupy, operate, control, and use the airport and the airport facilities owned by the
local government on that date, or under the jurisdiction of the St. Mary Parish
Council, subject only to any restrictions imposed by this Subpart.
(2) Exclusive rights and authority to occupy, operate, control, and use the
airport facilities.
(3) Acquire the operational jurisdiction over all real property of the airport
under its jurisdiction, including but not limited to terminals, runways, taxiways,
aprons, hangars, aids to air navigation, vehicles or facilities, parking facilities for
passengers and employees, and all buildings and facilities used to operate, maintain,
and manage the airport, including governmental, industrial, commercial, and
agricultural properties within the geographical area of the airports property, subject
to any liens on the real property and restrictions and limitations on the use of the real
property.
(4) Assume the local government's right, title, and interest in, and to all of
the local government's responsibilities arising under leases, concessions, and other
contracts for the airport facilities.
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-557 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 743
(5) Assume all financial obligations secured by revenues and fees generated
from the operations of the airport, including but not limited to airport revenue bonds,
special facilities revenue bonds, and all bonded indebtedness associated with the
airport.
(6) Assume ownership of all cash balances and investments relating to or
resulting from operations of the airport for which operational jurisdiction has been
transferred to the district, all money held under an ordinance, resolution, or indenture
related to or securing obligations of the local government that have been assumed by
the district, all of the accounts receivable or actions arising from operations of the
airport, and all benefits of contracts and agreements.
(7) Assume ownership of all vehicles, office equipment, furniture and
furnishings, and movable assets, including but not limited to computers, records and
files, software licenses required for financial management, personnel management,
accounting and inventory systems, and general administration.
§350.5. Annual financial report; audit
The district shall submit an annual financial report disclosing all receipts and
disbursements to the St. Mary Parish Council within one hundred twenty days
following the end of each calender year.
§350.6. Local government compliance
The local government shall comply with all of the following:
(1) Refrain from any action that would impair the district's exercise of the
powers granted to it under this Subpart or that could cause the district to violate its
rate or bond covenants.
(2) Refrain from any action to sell, transfer, or otherwise encumber or
dispose of airport facilities owned by the local government without the consent of
the district and, if necessary, the FAA.
(3) Take all action reasonably necessary to cure any defects in title to airport
facilities transferred to the district.
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-557 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 743
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.